Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB791.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 7384 of Title 35 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 7384. Pennsylvania State Fire Academy.* * *(d.1) Religious exemption.--An individual seeking firefighter certification shall be granted a religious exemption towards each training standard established under subsection (d) if the individual's religion prevents them from shaving or trimming their beard. The religious exemption shall only apply if the individual is able to pass a fit test to adequately seal a self-contained breathing apparatus mask on the individual's face with the seal meeting the standards set by the State Fire 1234567891011121314151617 Commissioner under the Statewide firefighter training program.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0791PN0815 - 2 - 123